Montana, session 2025, HB337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 15-30-2103, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-30-2103. Rate of tax -- net long-term capital gains -- definitions. (1) Except as provided in
subsections (2) and (3) subsection (2), there must be levied, collected, and paid for each tax year on the
Montana taxable income of each taxpayer subject to this chapter a tax on the brackets of taxable income as
follows:
(a) for every married individual who files a joint return and for every surviving spouse:
(i) on the first $41,000 $140,000 $95,000 of Montana taxable income or any part of that income,
4.7%;
(ii) on any Montana taxable income in excess of $41,000 $140,000 $95,000 or any part of that
income, 5.9% 5.65%;
(b) for every head of household:
(i) on the first $30,750 $105,000 $71,250 of Montana taxable income or any part of that income,
4.7%;
(ii) on any Montana taxable income in excess of $30,750 $105,000 $71,250 or any part of that
income, 5.9% 5.65%;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 337

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0337.4
(c) for every individual other than a surviving spouse or head of household who is not a married
individual:
(i) on the first $20,500 $70,000 $47,500 of Montana taxable income or any part of that income,
4.7%;
(ii) on any Montana taxable income in excess of $20,500 $70,000 $47,500 or any part of that
income, 5.9% 5.65%;
(d) for every married individual who does not make a joint return and for every estate or trust not
exempt from taxation under the Internal Revenue Code:
(i) on the first $20,500 $70,000 $47,500 of Montana taxable income or any part of that income,
4.7%;
(ii) on any Montana taxable income in excess of $20,500 $70,000 $47,500 or any part of that
income, 5.9% 5.65%.
(2) Except as provided in 15-30-3704 and subsection (3) of this section, that portion of a taxpayer's
Montana taxable income that consists of net long-term capital gains after accounting for amounts included in
taxable income that is not net long-term capital gains is subject to a tax on the brackets of net long-term capital
gains as follows:
(a) for every married individual who files a joint return and for every surviving spouse:
(i) on the first $41,000 $140,000 $95,000 less nonqualified taxable income of net long-term capital
gains, 3.0%;
(ii) on net long-term capital gains that exceed $41,000 $140,000 $95,000 less nonqualified taxable
income or any part of that income, 4.1%, except that if the total nonqualified taxable income is $41,000
$140,000 $95,000 or greater, all of the net long-term capital gains are taxed at 4.1%;
(b) for every head of household:
(i) on the first $30,750 $105,000 $71,250 less nonqualified taxable income of net long-term capital
gains, 3.0%;
(ii) on any net long-term capital gains that exceed $30,750 $105,000 $71,250 less nonqualified
taxable income or any part of that income, 4.1%, except that if the total nonqualified taxable income is $30,750
$105,000 $71,250 or greater, all of the net long-term capital gains are taxed at 4.1%;
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 337

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0337.4
(c) for every individual other than a surviving spouse or head of household who is not a married
individual:
(i) on the first $20,500 $70,000 $47,500 less nonqualified taxable income of net long-term capital
gains, 3.0%;
(ii) on any net long-term capital gains that exceed $20,500 $70,000 $47,500 less nonqualified
taxable income or any part of that income, 4.1%, except that if the total nonqualified taxable income is $20,500
$70,000 $47,500 or greater, all of the net long-term capital gains are taxed at 4.1%;
(d) for every married individual who does not make a joint return and for every estate or trust that
is not exempt from taxation under the Internal Revenue Code:
(i) on the first $20,500 $70,000 $47,500 less nonqualified taxable income of net long-term capital
gains, 3.0%;
(ii) on any net long-term capital gains that exceed $20,500 $70,000 $47,500 less nonqualified
taxable income or any part of that income, 4.1%, except that if the total nonqualified taxable income is $20,500
$70,000 $47,500 or greater, all of the net long-term capital gains are taxed at 4.1%.
(3) By November 1 of each year, the department shall multiply the bracket amounts contained in
subsections (1) and (2) by the inflation factor for the following tax year and round the cumulative brackets to the
nearest $100. The resulting adjusted brackets are effective for that following tax year and must be used as the
basis for imposition of the tax in subsections (1) and (2).
(4)(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Net long-term capital gains" means net long-term capital gains as that term is defined in
section 1222 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 1222.
(b) "Nonqualified taxable income" means Montana taxable income that is not considered net long-
term capital gains."

Section 2. Section 15-30-2103, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-30-2103. Rate of tax -- net long-term capital gains -- definitions. (1) Except as provided in
subsections (2) and (3), there must be levied, collected, and paid for each tax year on the Montana taxable
income of each taxpayer subject to this chapter a tax on the brackets of taxable income as follows:
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 337

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0337.4
(a) for every married individual who files a joint return and for every surviving spouse:
(i) on the first $41,000 $200,000 $130,000 of Montana taxable income or any part of that income,
4.7%;
(ii) on any Montana taxable income in excess of $41,000 $200,000 $130,000 or any part of that
income, 5.9%:
(A) , 5.4% FOR TAX YEARS BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2026, UNLESS A RATE REDUCTION OCCURS
UNDER THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (1)(A)(II)(B) ;

(B) 5.05% FOR THE FIRST TAX YEAR AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2027, WHEN STATE REVENUE AND RESERVES
ARE SUFFICIENT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (4), OR 5. 4 % IF STATE REVENUE AND RESERVES ARE NOT SUFFICIENT ;

(C) 5.05% FOR ANY SUBSEQUENT TAX YEAR AFTER THE RATE REDUCTION IN SUBSECTION (1)(A)(II)(B),
UNLESS A RATE REDUCTION OCCURS UNDER THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (1)(A)(II)(D) ;

(D) 4.7% FOR ALL TAX YEARS BEGINNING AFTER THE TAX YEAR OF THE RATE REDUCTION TO 5.05%, IF
STATE REVENUE AND RESERVES ARE SUFFICIENT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (4);
(b) for every head of household:
(i) on the first $30,750 $150,000 $97,500 of Montana taxable income or any part of that income,
4.7%;
(ii) on any Montana taxable income in excess of $30,750 $150,000 $97,500 or any part of that
income, 5.9%:
(A) , 5.4% FOR TAX YEARS BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2026, UNLESS A RATE REDUCTION OCCURS
UNDER THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (1)(B)(II)(B);
(B) 5.05% FOR THE FIRST TAX YEAR AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2027, WHEN STATE REVENUE AND RESERVES
ARE SUFFICIENT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (4), OR 5.4% IF STATE REVENUE AND RESERVES ARE NOT SUFFICIENT;
(C) 5.05% FOR ANY SUBSEQUENT TAX YEAR AFTER THE RATE REDUCTION IN SUBSECTION (1)(B)(II)(B),
UNLESS A RATE REDUCTION OCCURS UNDER THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (1)(B)(II)(D);

- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 337

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0337.4
(D) 4.7% FOR ALL TAX YEARS BEGINNING AFTER THE TAX YEAR OF THE RATE REDUCTION TO 5.05%, IF
STATE REVENUE AND RESERVES ARE SUFFICIENT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (4);
(c) for every individual other than a surviving spouse or head of household who is not a married
individual:
(i) on the first $20,500 $100,000 $65,000 of Montana taxable income or any part of that income,
4.7%;
(ii) on any Montana taxable income in excess of $20,500 $100,000 $65,000 or any part of that
income, 5.9%:
(A) , 5.4% FOR TAX YEARS BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2026, UNLESS A RATE REDUCTION OCCURS
UNDER THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (1)(C)(II)(B);
(B) 5.05% FOR THE FIRST TAX YEAR AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2027, WHEN STATE REVENUE AND RESERVES
ARE SUFFICIENT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (4), OR 5.4% IF STATE REVENUE AND RESERVES ARE NOT SUFFICIENT;
(C) 5.05% FOR ANY SUBSEQUENT TAX YEAR AFTER THE RATE REDUCTION IN SUBSECTION (1)(C)(II)(B),
UNLESS A RATE REDUCTION OCCURS UNDER THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (1)(C)(II)(D);

(D) 4.7% FOR ALL TAX YEARS BEGINNING AFTER THE TAX YEAR OF THE RATE REDUCTION TO 5.05%, IF
STATE REVENUE AND RESERVES ARE SUFFICIENT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (4);
(d) for every married individual who does not make a joint return and for every estate or trust not
exempt from taxation under the Internal Revenue Code:
(i) on the first $20,500 $100,000 $65,000 of Montana taxable income or any part of that income,
4.7%;
(ii) on any Montana taxable income in excess of $20,500 $100,000 $65,000 or any part of that
income, 5.9%:
(A) , 5.4% FOR TAX YEARS BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2026, UNLESS A RATE REDUCTION OCCURS
UNDER THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (1)(D)(II)(B);
(B) 5.05% FOR THE FIRST TAX YEAR AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2027, WHEN STATE REVENUE AND RESERVES
ARE SUFFICIENT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (4), OR 5.4% IF STATE REVENUE AND RESERVES ARE NOT SUFFICIENT;
(C) 5.05% FOR ANY SUBSEQUENT TAX YEAR AFTER THE RATE REDUCTION IN SUBSECTION (1)(D)(II)(B),
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 337

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0337.4
UNLESS A RATE REDUCTION OCCURS UNDER THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (1)(D)(II)(D);

(D) 4.7% FOR ALL TAX YEARS BEGINNING AFTER THE TAX YEAR OF THE RATE REDUCTION TO 5.05%, IF
STATE REVENUE AND RESERVES ARE SUFFICIENT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (4).
(2) Except as provided in 15-30-3704 and subsection (3) of this section AND SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS
SECTION, that portion of a taxpayer's Montana taxable income that consists of net long-term capital gains after
accounting for amounts included in taxable income that is not net long-term capital gains is subject to a tax on
the brackets of net long-term capital gains as follows:
(a) for every married individual who files a joint return and for every surviving spouse:
(i) on the first $41,000 $200,000 $130,000 less nonqualified taxable income of net long-term
capital gains, 3.0%;
(ii) on net long-term capital gains that exceed $41,000 $200,000 $130,000 less nonqualified
taxable income or any part of that income, 4.1%, except that if the total nonqualified taxable income is $41,000
$200,000 $130,000 or greater, all of the net long-term capital gains are taxed at 4.1%;
(b) for every head of household:
(i) on the first $30,750 $150,000 $97,500 less nonqualified taxable income of net long-term capital
gains, 3.0%;
(ii) on any net long-term capital gains that exceed $30,750 $150,000 $97,500 less nonqualified
taxable income or any part of that income, 4.1%, except that if the total nonqualified taxable income is $30,750
$150,000 $97,500 or greater, all of the net long-term capital gains are taxed at 4.1%;
(c) for every individual other than a surviving spouse or head of household who is not a married
individual:
(i) on the first $20,500 $100,000 $65,000 less nonqualified taxable income of net long-term capital
gains, 3.0%;
(ii) on any net long-term capital gains that exceed $20,500 $100,000 $65,000 less nonqualified
taxable income or any part of that income, 4.1%, except that if the total nonqualified taxable income is $20,500
$100,000 $65,000 or greater, all of the net long-term capital gains are taxed at 4.1%;
(d) for every married individual who does not make a joint return and for every estate or trust that
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 337

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0337.4
is not exempt from taxation under the Internal Revenue Code:
(i) on the first $20,500 $100,000 $65,000 less nonqualified taxable income of net long-term capital
gains, 3.0%;
(ii) on any net long-term capital gains that exceed $20,500 $100,000 $65,000 less nonqualified
taxable income or any part of that income, 4.1%, except that if the total nonqualified taxable income is $20,500
$100,000 $65,000 or greater, all of the net long-term capital gains are taxed at 4.1%.
(3) By November 1 of each year, the department shall multiply the bracket amounts contained in
subsections (1) and (2) by the MODIFIED inflation factor for the following tax year and round the cumulative
brackets to the nearest $100. The resulting adjusted brackets are effective for that following tax year and must
be used as the basis for imposition of the tax in subsections (1) and (2).
(4) (A) THE REDUCED RATE OF TAX PROVIDED FOR IN SUBSECTIONS (1)(A)(II)(B), (1)(A)(II)(D),
(1)(B)(II)(B), (1)(B)(II)(D), (1)(C)(II)(B), (1)(C)(II)(D), (1)(D)(II)(B), AND (1)(D)(II)(D), IS NOT APPLICABLE UNLESS:

(I) THE BALANCE IN THE BUDGET STABILIZATION RESERVE FUND PROVIDED FOR IN 17-7-130 WAS AT LEAST
16% OF ALL GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS IN THE SECOND YEAR OF THE BIENNIUM PURSUANT TO 17-7-130(5); AND

(II) THE GENERAL FUND REVENUE COLLECTIONS FROM THE INDIVIDUAL INCOME TAX PROVIDED FOR IN
TITLE 15, CHAPTER 30, FOR THE TWO MOST RECENTLY COMPLETED FISCAL YEARS AVERAGES AT LEAST 10% GREATER
THAN THE GENERAL FUND REVENUE COLLECTIONS FROM THE INDIVIDUAL INCOME TAX PROVIDED FOR IN TITLE 15,
CHAPTER 30, FOR THE THIRD MOST RECENTLY COMPLETED FISCAL YEAR ..

(B) STARTING IN 2027, BY SEPTEMBER 15 OF EACH YEAR THE BUDGET DIRECTOR SHALL CERTIFY TO THE
STATE TREASURER, THE LEGISLATIVE FISCAL ANALYST, AND THE DEPARTMENT REGARDING WHETHER THE CONDITIONS
OF SUBSECTION (4)(A)(I) AND (4)(A)(II) WERE SATISFIED FOR THE MOST RECENTLY COMPLETED FISCAL YEAR. IF THE
BUDGET DIRECTOR CERTIFIES THAT BOTH CONDITIONS ARE SATISFIED, THE REDUCED RATE OF TAX IS IN EFFECT FOR THE
FOLLOWING CALENDAR YEAR.
(4) (5) (4) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Modified inflation factor" has the same meaning as "inflation factor" as defined in 15-30-2101,
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 337

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0337.4
except that the consumer price index for June 2027 2026 is substituted for the consumer price index for June
2023.
(a)(b) "Net long-term capital gains" means net long-term capital gains as that term is defined in
section 1222 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 1222.
(b)(c) "Nonqualified taxable income" means Montana taxable income that is not considered net long-
term capital gains."

SECTION 3. SECTION 15-30-2318, MCA, IS AMENDED TO READ:
"15-30-2318. Earned income tax credit. (1) Except as provided in subsection (3), a resident
taxpayer is allowed as a credit against the tax imposed by 15-30-2103 a percentage of the credit allowed for the
federal earned income credit for which the individual taxpayer is eligible for the tax year under section 32 of the
Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 32.
(2) The amount of the credit allowed under subsection (1) is 10% 20% of the amount of the credit
determined for the tax year under section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 32.
(3) The credit is not allowed on earned income that is treated as a dividend received by a member
of an agricultural organization provided for in section 501(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 501(d).
For the purpose of this subsection, the amount of the state tax credit provided for in subsection (2) is reduced
by the reduction percentage.
(4) The taxpayer is entitled to a refund equal to the amount by which the credit exceeds the
taxpayer's tax liability or, if the taxpayer has no tax liability under this chapter, a refund equal to the amount of
the credit. The credit may be claimed by filing a Montana income tax return.
(5) For the purpose of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Earned income" means earned income, as defined in section 32 of the Internal Revenue
Code, 26 U.S.C. 32, that was used to determine the amount of the federal earned income tax credit under
subsection (2).
(b) "Reduction percentage" means a percentage that is calculated by dividing the earned income
that is disallowed under subsection (3) by the total amount of earned income."

- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 337

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0337.4
NEW SECTION. Section 4. Transition. The modified inflation factor provided for in 15-30-2103(3)
does not apply until tax year 2028.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Effective dates. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3), [this
act] is effective on October 1, 2025.
(2) [Section SECTIONS 1 AND 3] is ARE effective January 1, 2026.
(3) [Section 2] is effective January 1, 2027.

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Applicability. (1) [Section SECTIONS 1 AND 3] applies APPLY to the
income tax year beginning January 1, 2026.
(2) [Section 2] applies to income tax years beginning after December 31, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Termination. [Section 1] terminates December 31, 2026.
- END -
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – HB 337